Illinois, session 104th, HB5158.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Agricultural Protection Area Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds that:7        (1) Working farms provide essential benefits to 8    Illinois by sustaining the State's economy, food and fiber 9    production, and the cultural heritage of local 10    communities.11        (2) Agricultural land is increasingly threatened by 12    conversion to nonagricultural uses.13        (3) It is the policy of this State to encourage 14    voluntary efforts to preserve and enhance the long-term 15    viability of agricultural land and to minimize unnecessary 16    governmental interference with property rights. 17    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act:18    "Agricultural production" means activities conducted on 19land actively devoted to agriculture, including the 20cultivation of crops and the raising of livestock and poultry, 21and associated on farm structures and practices.22    "Agricultural protection area" means one or more specific   HB5158- 2 -LRB104 17459 BDA 30885 b1parcels of land voluntarily designated under this Act for the 2purpose of protecting and preserving agricultural use.3    "Applicant" means a person who owns 5 acres or more of land 4that has been in active agricultural production for the 5previous 3 consecutive years and who applies for that land to 6be part of an agricultural protection area.7    "Department" means the Illinois Department of Agriculture.8    "Generally accepted farming practices" means farming 9practices that are customary in Illinois agriculture and 10consistent with applicable State and federal laws and rules.11    "Hardship" means a situation or circumstance over which a 12landowner in an agricultural protection area has no control, 13including, without limitation, an adverse result in litigation 14against the farm or landowner; the death of a close family 15member leading to unanticipated financial hardship; 16significant tax liabilities; bankruptcy due to another 17person's fraud; or other illegal activity.18    "Unit of local government" has the meaning given in 19Section 1 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution. 20    Section 15. Agricultural protection area program; rules. 21The Department shall establish and administer a voluntary 22statewide program for the creation and recognition of 23agricultural protection areas and shall adopt rules to 24implement this Act. At a minimum, the rules must:25        (1) establish a process through which agricultural   HB5158- 3 -LRB104 17459 BDA 30885 b1    lands may be designated as agricultural protection areas 2    for a minimum of 20 years;3        (2) establish application requirements, including 4    information about the landowner, a legal description of 5    the parcel or parcels, and current uses of the land;6        (3) establish clear and objective standards for 7    evaluating applications, including consideration of 8    agricultural productivity, continuity of agricultural use, 9    and compatibility with local and regional land use plans;10        (4) establish timelines for reviewing and making 11    decisions on applications; and12        (5) provide for reasonable application and 13    administration fees that do not exceed the Department's 14    actual costs. 15    Section 20. Agricultural Protection Area Commission. The 16Department may appoint an Agricultural Protection Area 17Commission to advise the Department regarding agricultural 18needs of the State and to make recommendations on applications 19under this Act. The Commission shall consist of 5 to 7 members 20with experience in Illinois production agriculture or 21agricultural conservation, which may include representatives 22from soil and water conservation districts, the Illinois Farm 23Bureau, a commodity or grower association, the University of 24Illinois Extension, or other relevant organizations. 25Commission members shall serve terms established by the   HB5158- 4 -LRB104 17459 BDA 30885 b1Department of not less than 3 years and not more than 6 years. 2    Section 25. Application review and action.3    (a) Within 60 days after receiving the Commission's 4recommendation to support or reject an application, the 5Department shall provide public notice of the application and 6accept written comments for at least 14 days. The Department 7may hold a public meeting if it believes additional input is 8warranted.9    (b) The Department may approve or deny an application to 10designate land as an agricultural protection area. If 11approved, the designation is effective upon final action by 12the Department.13    (c) If the Department fails to take action on the 14Commission's recommendation within 60 days after receiving the 15recommendation, the Commission's recommendation becomes final 16agency action for purposes of judicial review under the 17Administrative Review Law. 18    Section 30. Recording of agricultural protection areas.19    (a) To provide constructive notice of an agricultural 20protection area designation to persons who have, may acquire, 21or may seek to acquire an interest in land in or adjacent to 22the agricultural protection area, the landowner shall record 23with the recorder of deeds of the county in which the land is 24located, within 10 days after the designation, a notice of   HB5158- 5 -LRB104 17459 BDA 30885 b1designation in a form prescribed by the Department that 2includes:3        (1) the date of designation or dissolution of the 4    agricultural protection area;5        (2) a legal description of the parcel or parcels 6    included in the agricultural protection area; and7        (3) a copy of the Department's final decision or 8    certification of designation.9    (b) Failure to record the notice does not invalidate a 10Department decision to designate or dissolve an agricultural 11protection area, but the Department may require recording as a 12condition of continued recognition. 13    Section 35. Renewal of agricultural protection areas.14    (a) Twenty years after the creation of an agricultural 15protection area, if the landowner desires to continue the 16designation, no action by the landowner is required and the 17Department shall automatically renew the agricultural 18protection area for another 20 years.19    (b) If the landowner desires to terminate the agricultural 20protection area, the landowner shall provide written notice to 21the Department at least 90 days before the expiration of the 22designation. The Department shall notify the appropriate 23recorder of deeds of any termination and the landowner shall 24record a notice of termination.   HB5158- 6 -LRB104 17459 BDA 30885 b1    Section 40. Adding land to and removing land from an 2agricultural protection area.3    (a) A landowner may add land to an existing agricultural 4protection area by filing an application with the Department. 5The Department shall review the application in accordance with 6this Act and rules adopted under this Act.7    (b) A landowner of land within an agricultural protection 8area may remove any or all of that land from the agricultural 9protection area by filing a petition for removal with the 10Department. The Department shall acknowledge receipt of the 11petition in writing and confirm the removal date as 10 years 12from the date of the petition for removal, or upon expiration 13of the designation, whichever is sooner.14    (c) The Department shall establish by rule a process by 15which a landowner may remove land from an agricultural 16protection area for reasons of hardship, as defined in Section 1710.18    (d) The Department may charge a reasonable administrative 19fee to cover its actual costs associated with processing 20changes to an agricultural protection area, including updating 21maps, recording documents, and staff time. 22    Section 45. Limitations on local regulations within 23agricultural protection areas.24    (a) A unit of local government shall encourage the 25continuity, development, and viability of agricultural use   HB5158- 7 -LRB104 17459 BDA 30885 b1within the boundaries of an agricultural protection area and 2may not adopt or enforce an ordinance or regulation that 3conflicts with this Act or rules adopted under this Act with 4respect to farm structures or farming practices within an 5agricultural protection area, unless the farm structure or 6farming practice does not comply with generally accepted 7farming practices or violates applicable State or federal law.8    (b) Nothing in this Section prevents a unit of local 9government from regulating the siting of residential, 10commercial, manufacturing, industrial, solar energy, or wind 11energy structures, or from regulating other nonagricultural 12land uses on lands included within an agricultural protection 13area, to the extent consistent with this Act and other 14applicable law. 15    Section 50. Nuisances.16    (a) Agricultural activities conducted within an 17agricultural protection area in accordance with generally 18accepted farming practices and applicable law are not a public 19nuisance.20    (b) In a civil action for nuisance or a criminal action for 21public nuisance, it is a complete defense if the action 22involves otherwise lawful agricultural activities that were 23(1) conducted within an agricultural protection area; and (2) 24not in violation of any federal, State, or local law or 25regulation relating to the alleged nuisance and were conducted   HB5158- 8 -LRB104 17459 BDA 30885 b1using generally accepted farming practices.2    (c) Nothing in this Section limits or diminishes the 3protections afforded by the Farm Nuisance Suit Act. 4    Section 55. Eminent domain. Subject to the Eminent Domain 5Act, a unit of local government or other political subdivision 6may not condemn land within an agricultural protection area 7that is being used for agricultural production for purposes 8unrelated to public health or safety, transportation, or 9public utilities. Nothing in this Section limits or alters 10condemnation powers expressly authorized by the Eminent Domain 11Act. 12    Section 60. Home rule. A home rule unit may not regulate 13farm structures or farming practices within an agricultural 14protection area in a manner more restrictive than the 15regulation by the State under this Act and rules adopted under 16this Act. This Section is a limitation under subsection (i) of 17Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the 18concurrent exercise by home rule units of powers and functions 19exercised by the State. 20    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 21severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes.